Georgia statutes. TITLE 46 Public Utilities and Public Transportation
Article 5 Natural Gas Competition and Deregulation
46-4-160.5.
Retail customer recovery for violations.

Any retail customer who is damaged by a marketer’s violation of any provision of Code Section 46-4-160, any duly promulgated rules or regulations issued under such Code section, or any commission order shall be entitled to maintain a civil action and shall be entitled to recover actual damages sustained by the retail customer, as well as incidental damages, consequential damages, reasonable attorney’s fees, and court costs.

Any violation of Code Section 46-4-160 or any duly promulgated rules or regulations issued under such Code section is declared to be a violation of Part 2 of Article 15 of Chapter 1 of Title 10, the “Fair Business Practices Act of 1975.” Any remedy available under such part shall be available to any retail customer and any action by the Attorney General that such part authorizes for a violation of such part shall be authorized for violation of Code Section 46-4-160 or any duly promulgated rules or regulations issued under such Code section. This subsection shall not be construed to provide that other violations of this article or rules promulgated under this article are not violations of such part.

The provisions of this Code section shall apply to violations of subsections (g) and (h) of Code Section 46-4-156, Code Sections 46-4-158.2, 46-4-160.1, and 46-4-160.2, and substantial violations of Code Section 46-4-158.3.

History.

Code 1981, §

46-4-160.5

, enacted by Ga. L. 2002, p. 475, § 18; Ga. L. 2004, p. 631, § 46; Ga. L. 2015, p. 1088, § 41/SB 148.

Effective date. —

This Code section became effective April 25, 2002.

The 2004 amendment,

effective May 13, 2004, part of an Act to revise, modernize, and correct the Code, substituted “such part” for “such Act” throughout subsection (b).

The 2015 amendment,

effective July 1, 2015, substituted “Attorney General” for “administrator” in the second sentence of subsection (b).

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2002, p. 475, § 1, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “This Act shall be known and may be cited as the ‘Natural Gas Consumers’ Relief Act.’ ”

46-4-161.
Universal service fund.

The commission shall create for each electing distribution company a universal service fund for the purpose of:

Assuring that gas is available for sale by marketers to firm retail customers within the territory certificated to each such marketer;

Enabling the electing distribution company to expand its facilities and service in the public interest. Such expansion of facilities may include a natural gas fueling infrastructure for motor vehicles at the discretion of the commission; and

Assisting low-income residential consumers in times of emergency as determined by the commission, and consumers of the regulated provider of natural gas in accordance with Code Section 46-4-166.

The fund shall be administered by the commission under rules to be promulgated by the commission in accordance with the provisions of this Code section. Prior to the beginning of each fiscal year of the electing distribution company, the commission shall determine the amount of the fund appropriate for such fiscal year, which amount shall not exceed $25 million for that fiscal year. In making such determination, the commission shall consider the following:

The amount required to provide sufficient contributions in aid of construction to permit the electing distribution company to extend and expand its facilities from time to time as the commission deems to be in the public interest; and

The amount required to assist low-income residential consumers in times of emergency as determined by the commission and consumers of the regulated provider of natural gas in accordance with Code Section 46-4-166.

The fund shall be created and maintained from time to time from the following sources:

Rate refunds to the electing distribution company from its interstate pipeline suppliers;

Any earnings allocable to ratepayers under performance based rates of the electing distribution company authorized by this article;

A surcharge to the rates for firm distribution service of the electing distribution company authorized for such purpose by the commission from time to time;

Surcharges on customers receiving interruptible service over the electing distribution company’s distribution system imposed by the commission in accordance with Code Section 46-4-154;

Refunds of deposits required by marketers as a condition for service, if such refunds have not been delivered to or claimed by the consumer within two years;

Funds deposited by marketers in accordance with Code Section 46-4-160.3;

The proceeds from the sale or lease of facilities financed from the universal service fund; and

Any other payments to the fund as provided by law or by order of the commission.

Any amounts remaining in such fund at the end of a fiscal year in excess of $3 million shall be available for refund to retail customers in such manner as the commission shall deem equitable. The balance at fiscal year end, whether positive or negative, after such refund, if any, shall become the initial balance of the fund for the ensuing fiscal year.

Moneys in the fund shall be deposited in a separate, interest-bearing escrow account maintained by the electing distribution company at any state or federally chartered bank, trust company, or savings and loan association located in this state. Upon application to the commission, the commission shall order the distribution of an appropriate portion of such moneys on a quarterly basis and in accordance with the provisions of this Code section. Interest earned on moneys in the fund shall accrue to the benefit of the fund.

Distributions to the regulated provider shall be made in accordance with Code Section 46-4-166.

In determining whether to grant the application of an electing distribution company for a distribution from the fund in whole or in part, the commission shall consider:

The capital budget of the electing distribution company for the relevant fiscal year;

The estimated total overall applicable cost of the proposed extension, including construction costs, financing costs, working capital requirements, and engineering and contracting fees, as well as all other costs that are necessary and reasonable;

The projected initial service date of the new facilities, the estimated revenues to the electing distribution company during the first five fiscal years following the initial service date, and the estimated rate of return to the electing distribution company produced by such revenues during each such fiscal year;

The amount of the contribution in aid of construction required for the revenues from the proposed new facility to produce a just and reasonable return to the electing distribution company; and

Whether the proposed new facility is in the public interest.

In no event shall the distribution to an electing distribution company from the fund for facilities and service expansion during any fiscal year exceed 5 percent of the capital budget of such company for such fiscal year.

Any investment in new facilities financed from the universal service fund shall be accounted for as a contribution in aid of construction.

In no event shall an electing distribution company, who receives a distribution from the fund, sell or lease any facilities financed by the fund to an affiliate for less than the higher of the net book value or fair market value of such facility without approval by the commission.

History.

Code 1981, §

46-4-161

, enacted by Ga. L. 1997, p. 798, § 4; Ga. L. 2001, p. 1084, § 5; Ga. L. 2001, p. 1206, § 5; Ga. L. 2002, p. 475, § 19; Ga. L. 2011, p. 475, §§ 2-4/SB 108.

The 2002 amendment,

effective April 25, 2002, rewrote this Code section.

The 2011 amendment,

effective May 11, 2011, inserted “. Such expansion of facilities may include a natural gas fueling infrastructure for motor vehicles at the discretion of the commission” in paragraph (a)(2); in subsection (c), deleted “and” at the end of paragraph (c)(6), added present paragraph (c)(7), redesignated former paragraph (c)(7) as paragraph (c)(8), and, in paragraph (c)(8), inserted “as” and added “or by order of the commission” at the end; and added subsection (h).

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2002, p. 475, § 1, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “This Act shall be known and may be cited as the ‘Natural Gas Consumers’ Relief Act.’ ”

Ga. L. 2011, p. 475, § 1, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “This Act shall be known and may be cited as the ‘Energy Independence and Rate Payer Protection Act.’ ”

Administrative rules and regulations.

Universal Service Fund, Official Compilation of Rules and Regulations of State of Georgia Public Service Commission, Gas Utilities, Chapter 515-7-5.

Law reviews.

For note on the 2001 amendment to O.C.G.A. §

46-4-161

, see 18 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 273 (2001).

For note on the 2001 amendment to O.C.G.A. §

46-4-161

, see 18 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 277 (2001).

46-4-162.
Commission’s authority to approve certain pilot programs.

Nothing in this article shall be construed to prohibit the commission from approving, upon application by a gas company, pilot programs which allow increased customer choice on such gas company’s distribution system but which are not otherwise subject to the provisions of this article.

History.

Code 1981, §

46-4-162

, enacted by Ga. L. 1997, p. 798, § 4.

46-4-163.
Special or negotiated contracts valid.

Any special or negotiated contract between a gas company and a retail customer approved by the commission shall not be invalidated or modified by the provisions of this article.

History.

Code 1981, §

46-4-163

, enacted by Ga. L. 1997, p. 798, § 4.

46-4-164.
Construction of article; electric membership corporations and EMC gas affiliates; liquefied petroleum gas.

Nothing in this article shall be deemed to apply or impose requirements not otherwise existing on gas distribution companies owned by any county, municipality, other political subdivision, or governmental authority of this state; nor are the provisions of this article intended to increase or decrease the authority and jurisdiction of the commission with respect to the distribution, sale, or transportation of gas by any county, municipality, other political subdivision, or governmental authority of this state. Nothing in this article shall be construed to limit or otherwise affect the existing powers of municipal corporations or other political subdivisions of this state relating to the granting of franchises or the levying or imposition of taxes, fees, or charges.

Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, including, without limitation, Article 4 of Chapter 3 of this title, an electric membership corporation may make and maintain investments in, lend funds to, and guarantee the debts and obligations of an EMC gas affiliate in total not to exceed 15 percent of such electric membership corporation’s net utility plant, excluding electric generation and transmission assets as defined by the Federal Energy Regulatory Commission Uniform System of Accounts in effect at the time of such investment, loan, or guarantee, provided that any such investments or loans shall not reflect rates which are generally available through the use of any tax exempt financing and may not be tied to any loans from or guaranteed by the federal or state government; and an EMC gas affiliate of an electric membership corporation organized and operating pursuant to Article 4 of Chapter 3 of this title may apply for and be granted a certificate of authority to provide any service as authorized under this article. The creation, capitalization, or provision of management for:

An EMC gas affiliate engaged in activities subject to the provisions of this article and the rules and regulations established by the commission; or

Other persons providing customer services

shall be deemed to be among the purposes of an electric membership corporation as specified in paragraphs (2) and (3) of Code Section 46-3-200. Nothing in this article shall be deemed to increase or decrease the authority and jurisdiction of the commission with respect to such electric membership corporation except as to gas activities undertaken by the electric membership corporation or its EMC gas affiliate as authorized under this chapter.

Nothing in this article shall be construed to allow or authorize an electing distribution company, a certificated marketer, or a regulated provider of natural gas to engage in the production, transportation, marketing, or distribution of liquefied petroleum gas; provided, however, that nothing in this article shall be construed to prohibit an electing distribution company from using liquefied petroleum gas to provide for system balancing and peaking services for its distribution system.

History.

Code 1981, §

46-4-164

, enacted by Ga. L. 1997, p. 798, § 4; Ga. L. 2002, p. 475, § 20.

The 2002 amendment,

effective April 25, 2002, designated the existing provisions as subsection (a) and added subsections (b) and (c).

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 2002, in subsection (b), a colon was added at the end of the introductory paragraph, “An” was substituted for “an” at the beginning of paragraph (b)(1), a semicolon was added following “commission” at the end of paragraph (b)(1), and “Other” was substituted for “other” at the beginning of paragraph (b)(2).

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2002, p. 475, § 1, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “This Act shall be known and may be cited as the ‘Natural Gas Consumers’ Relief Act.’ ”

46-4-165.
Annual reports.

The commission shall report to the General Assembly annually through the year 2002 on the status of the transition to competitive markets for natural gas services in Georgia.

History.

Code 1981, §

46-4-165

, enacted by Ga. L. 1997, p. 798, § 4.

46-4-166.
Selection by proposal of regulated provider to service low-income residential consumers and certain firm natural gas consumers; rates; annual review.

By July 1, 2002, the commission shall select a regulated provider of natural gas to serve:

Group 1, low-income residential consumers; and

Group 2, firm natural gas consumers:

Who have been unable to obtain or maintain natural gas commodity service; or

Whose utility payment history was cited by the regulated provider as reason for transfer from Group 1 to Group 2.

The selection shall be made through a competitive request for proposal process. Certificated marketers shall be eligible to submit proposals. Selection criteria for the regulated provider shall include, but not be limited to, the following:

Financial viability, as defined in Code Section 46-4-153;

Technical expertise, as defined in Code Section 46-4-153;

The amount of the proposed deposit requirements, proposed price structure, proposed customer charge, and cost recovery;

The terms and conditions proposed for transfers of consumers from Group 1 to Group 2 and from Group 2 to Group 1; and

The terms and conditions proposed for termination of service for Group 1 consumers and Group 2 consumers.

If no acceptable proposals are filed with the commission to become the regulated provider of natural gas, the commission shall designate the electing distribution company or any other gas or electric utility holding a certificate of public convenience and necessity from the commission if it consents to serve as the regulated provider of natural gas. A regulated provider who is not a certificated marketer shall not be authorized to provide natural gas commodity service to any consumer not included in subsection (a) of this Code section.

The regulated provider selected by the commission shall establish two rates for consumers served by the regulated provider of natural gas, which rates shall be approved by the commission as a part of the selection process for the regulated provider:

The rate for a low-income residential consumer shall be based upon actual commodity cost, a reasonable rate of return, and an equitable share of the cost of the transportation and distribution system over which such consumer receives distribution. Any low-income residential consumer may transfer to the regulated provider without being required to pay in full any debt to a marketer for previous service and without termination in service due to failure to pay such a debt. The regulated provider shall have access to the universal service fund to recover bad debt arising from service to low-income residential consumers in accordance with rules and regulations promulgated by the commission and designed to encourage efficient debt collection practices by the regulated provider. The electing distribution company shall waive any customer charge for each low-income residential consumer whose age exceeds 65 years. A low-income residential consumer served by the regulated provider at this rate shall be subject to transfer to Group 2 for failure to pay distribution or commodity charges under the terms and conditions specified in the proposal and accepted by the commission; and

The rate for Group 2 consumers shall be set to incorporate risks associated with these customers. The regulated provider shall be authorized to terminate service to a Group 2 consumer for failure to pay for commodity or distribution service. The regulated provider shall not have access to the universal service fund to recover bad debt arising from service to such consumers. A Group 2 consumer shall be eligible to transfer to Group 1 if such a consumer is eligible by income for Group 1 and meets criteria specified in the proposal and accepted by the commission.

The commission is authorized to promulgate rules and regulations to implement this Code section.

The commission shall annually review the performance of the regulated provider. The commission shall utilize the process set forth in subsections (a) and (b) of this Code section to select a regulated provider of natural gas every two years. If the commission determines, in its discretion, that such an action is in the public interest, the commission may extend the service of a regulated provider for a third year, or may terminate the service of a regulated provider after one year.

History.

Code 1981, §

46-4-166

, enacted by Ga. L. 2002, p. 475, § 21.

Effective date. —

This Code section became effective April 25, 2002.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2002, p. 475, § 1, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “This Act shall be known and may be cited as the ‘Natural Gas Consumers’ Relief Act.’ ”